Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202586-1049
Originating service provider, defined.

Except as provided in section 86-1068, originating service provider means an entity that provides the capability for customers to originate 911 calls to public safety answering points.

Laws 2016, LB938, § 20;

R.S.1943, (2024), § 86-1020;

Laws 2025, LB362, § 31.